California, session 20252026, AB1285.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13105.3 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:13105.3. The State Fire Marshal, in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services, shall develop fire prevention, response, and recovery measures for utility grade lithium-ion battery storage facilities.(a) The measures shall include best practices for the health and safety of emergency services personnel.(b) The measures shall include best practices for owners and operators to share timely and accurate information with local emergency managers and public safety agencies regarding incidents.